Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1101
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-1101 to 77-1120 shall be known and may be cited as the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB682, § 1.